Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1114XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 37 Section 1. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 A licensee may operate a motor vehicle unsupervised over 4 the most direct and accessible route between the licenseeâs 5 residence, school of enrollment, location where the licensee 6 receives competent private instruction or independent private 7 instruction, place of employment, location for farm work or 8 farm-related work if the licensee resides on a farm or is 9 employed for compensation on a farm in this state, established 10 place of religious worship, and the closest service station, 11 for any of the following purposes, as applicable, provided 12 the driving distance between the point of origin and the 13 destination is no more than twenty-five miles, and the licensee 14 is in immediate possession of the license card: 15 Sec. 2. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 16 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 17 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (06) To attend religious worship 18 services or participate in volunteer service programs at the 19 licenseeâs established place of religious worship. 20 Sec. 3. Section 321.194, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 21 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 a. Operate the motor vehicle except during the hour 23 before and after the beginning and end of the licenseeâs duly 24 scheduled courses of instruction, extracurricular activities, 25 work shift, farm work, or farm-related work, religious worship 26 service, or volunteer service program, as applicable. 27